Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 2

Long-Arm Statutes

20-2-201. Foreign corporations subject to actions.

Any corporation claiming existence under the laws of the United States or any other state or of any country foreign to the United States, or any business trust found doing business in this state, shall be subject to suit here to the same extent that corporations of this state are by the laws of this state liable to be sued, so far as relates to any transaction had, in whole or in part, within this state or any cause of action arising here, but not otherwise.

A corporation or trust having any transaction with persons or having any transaction concerning any property situated in this state, through any agency whatever acting for it within the state, shall be held to be doing business here within the meaning of this section.

Acts 1887, ch. 226, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 4543, 4544; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8676, 8677; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-220.

Cross-References. Corporations, registered agents and service of process, §§48-25-107 —48-25-110.

Nonprofit corporations, office and agent, title 48, ch. 55.

Nonprofit foreign corporations, title 48, ch. 65.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 132.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 1.22.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 111, 112, 118, 121; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, §§ 5, 13; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, §§ 8, 9.

Law Reviews.

A Tale of Two Jurisdictions, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 501 (2015).

Aligning Law and Forum: The Home Court Advantage, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

Constitutional Law — Personal Jurisdiction — A State's Ability to Exercise Jurisdiction over a Foreign Manufacturer, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 339 (2014).

Civil Procedure — Long Arm Statute — Davenport v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co.: Has Tennessee Fully Embraced the “Minimum Contacts” Test?, 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 117 (1989).

Civil Procedure — The Drafting of Legal Documents Governing the Sale of Real Property Within the Forum as a Basis for the Exercise of Long-Arm In Personam Jurisdiction, 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 667 (1985).

Federal Civil Procedure — Personal Jurisdiction — General Jurisdiction Over Foreign Corporations Based Upon Domestic Subsidiary Activity Within The Forum State, 82 Tenn. L. Rev. 461 (2015).

The Future of General Jurisdiction in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 559 (1997).

The Long-Arm Wrestle: Personal Jurisdiction in Tennessee (Steven E. Winn), 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (1989).

Cited: Howell v. Shepherd, 29 Tenn. App. 375, 196 S.W.2d 849, 1945 Tenn. App. LEXIS 116 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1945); Atchison, T. & S. F. R. Co. v. Ortiz, 50 Tenn. App. 317, 361 S.W.2d 113, 1962 Tenn. App. LEXIS 152 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1962); Temco, Inc. v. General Screw Products, Inc., 261 F. Supp. 793, 1966 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7977 (M.D. Tenn. 1966); Chambliss v. Coca-Cola Bottling Corp., 274 F. Supp. 401, 1967 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11090 (E.D. Tenn. 1967); Southern Machine Co. v. Mohasco Industries, Inc., 401 F.2d 374, 1968 U.S. App. LEXIS 5493 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1968); Paulk v. Paulk, 656 S.W.2d 34, 1983 Tenn. App. LEXIS 696 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1983); Four Seasons Gardening & Landscaping, Inc. v. Crouch, 688 S.W.2d 439, 1984 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3449 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1984); Walker v. Nationwide Ins. Co., 813 S.W.2d 135, 1990 Tenn. App. LEXIS 766 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1990); Southern Sys. v. Torrid Oven Ltd., 58 F. Supp. 2d 843, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16913 (W.D. Tenn. 1999); Lamb v. Megaflight, Inc., 26 S.W.3d 627, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 82 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000).

20-2-202. Actions against unincorporated associations and nonresident partnerships.

Any unincorporated association or organization, whether resident or nonresident, including nonresident partnerships and nonresident trusts, doing or desiring to do business in this state by performing any of the acts for which it was formed, shall, before any such acts are performed, appoint an agent in this state upon whom all process may be served, and certify to the clerk of the circuit court of each county in which the association or organization desires to perform any of the acts for which it was organized the name and address of the process agent.

If the unincorporated association or organization fails to appoint the process agent pursuant to this section, all process may be served upon the secretary of the state of Tennessee;

Upon such service, the secretary of state, by registered or certified return receipt mail, shall forward a copy of the process to the last known address of the unincorporated association or organization.

Service upon the process agent appointed pursuant to this section, or upon the secretary of state if no process agent is appointed, shall be legal and binding on the association or organization, and any judgment recovered in any action commenced by service of process, as provided in this section, shall be valid and may be collected out of any real or personal property belonging to the association or organization.

Acts 1947, ch. 32, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8679.1 (Williams, §§ 8681.1-8681.3); modified; Acts 1959, ch. 110, § 1; 1963, ch. 254, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-223; Acts 1981, ch. 215, § 1.

Cross-References. Actions relating to unincorporated associations, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 23.07.

Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Service where managing agent or officer found in state, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.04.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Associations and Clubs, § 6; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 118; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, § 52; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, §§ 9, 14; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Partnerships — Conflict of Laws — Legal Entity Concept, 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 304.

The Future of General Jurisdiction in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 559 (1997).

Cited: American Federation of Musicians v. Stein, 213 F.2d 679, 1954 U.S. App. LEXIS 3801 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1954); Martin v. Dealers Transport Co., 48 Tenn. App. 1, 342 S.W.2d 245, 1960 Tenn. App. LEXIS 104 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1960); W. D. Lawson & Co. v. Penn Cent. Co., 456 F.2d 419, 1972 U.S. App. LEXIS 11032 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1972).

20-2-203. Use of highways as appointment of agent for process — Pre-trial discovery depositions.

Any owner, chauffeur or operator of any motor vehicle that is not licensed under the laws of this state, or any nonresident who, acting in behalf of the owner of any such vehicle, uses or causes to be used any such motor vehicle in this state, or any nonresident of this state who hires or procures the use of a motor vehicle licensed under the laws of this state, for temporary use in this state, and who makes use of the privilege, extended to nonresidents of the state to operate such vehicle on highway or highways within the state, shall be deemed thereby to constitute the secretary of state of this state as agent for acceptance of service of process in any civil action brought by any person against the owner, chauffeur or operator of such motor vehicle or nonresident arising out of any accident or injury occurring in this state in which such vehicle is involved;

Such use of a highway shall be treated as an agreement on the part of such person that such service of process shall have the force and validity of personal service on the owner, chauffeur or operator of such motor vehicle or nonresident within the jurisdiction of this state and the county of action.

As used in this section, “nonresident” includes any person who, though a resident of this state or who was the owner or operator of a motor vehicle properly registered and licensed under the laws of this state when the motor vehicle accident or injury occurred, has been absent from this state for at least thirty (30) days next preceding the day on which process is lodged with the secretary of state as provided in § 20-2-205.

The agency of the secretary of state to accept service of process in actions for both personal injuries and property damages shall continue for such period of time or so long as the cause of action is not barred by the statute of limitations of this state and shall not be revoked by the death of the nonresident during that period of time. The agency shall continue so long after the expiration of such time as may be necessary to enable the secretary of state to complete the service of process, sued out prior to the expiration of the time and forwarded to the defendant with reasonable dispatch.

The secretary of state shall keep a docket in which the secretary of state enters the style of the cause, the date of issuance of such process, the date of its receipt by the secretary of state and the date on which it was forwarded by the secretary of state to the person named as defendant in the cause.

For the purpose of venue as set out in § 20-4-101, the secretary of state may be considered by the plaintiff as either a resident of the county in which the cause of action arose or the county in which the plaintiff resides.

Any owner, chauffeur or operator of any motor vehicle that is not licensed under the laws of this state, or any nonresident who, acting in behalf of the owner of any such vehicle, uses or causes to be used any such motor vehicle in this state, or any nonresident who hires or procures the use of a motor vehicle licensed under the laws of this state, for temporary use in the state, and who is duly served with process under this section and §§ 20-2-204 — 20-2-207, in connection with any civil action brought by any person against the owner, chauffeur or operator, or nonresident arising out of any accident or injury occurring in this state in which the vehicle is involved, shall be required, upon receipt of the proper notice as required in title 24, chapter 9 to appear at the time and place specified in the notice, which shall be in the county in which the action is pending, for the purpose of giving a pretrial discovery deposition as authorized by the rules of civil procedure and title 24, chapter 9. The written notice required by § 20-2-205 to be sent to any person served under §§ 20-2-204 — 20-2-207, along with a certified copy of the original summons, shall include a notification to the effect that the person shall be subject to appearance in this state for the purpose of giving a pretrial discovery deposition if subsequently served with proper notice to do so.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as a prohibition on the exercise of jurisdiction over or service of process on a person who is deemed by this section to constitute the secretary of state as the person's agent, pursuant to §§ 20-2-214 — 20-2-219.

Code 1932, § 8671; Acts 1947, ch. 235, § 1; 1949, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8671; Acts 1955, ch. 265, § 1; 1957, ch. 61, § 1; 1963, ch. 269, § 1; 1968, ch. 574, § 1; 1970, ch. 396, § 1; 1972, ch. 470, § 1; 1977, ch. 348, § 1; 1979, ch. 418, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-224.

Cross-References. Liability insurance on motor vehicles, §56-7-1101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-8-4.1, 1-8-6, 1-8-10.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, § 9; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Carr v. Borchers: Tennessee's Nonresident Motorist Statute Revisited, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 357 (1992).

The Future of General Jurisdiction in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 559 (1997).

Cited: Fowler v. Herman, 200 Tenn. 201, 292 S.W.2d 11, 1956 Tenn. LEXIS 396 (1956); Shelton v. Breeding, 43 Tenn. App. 609, 310 S.W.2d 469, 1957 Tenn. App. LEXIS 138 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1957); Lovejoy v. Ahearn, 223 Tenn. 562, 448 S.W.2d 420, 1969 Tenn. LEXIS 442 (1969); Speight v. Miller, 437 F.2d 781, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 11951 (7th Cir. Ill. 1971); McDavid v. James, 64 F.R.D. 182, 1973 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10620 (D. Tenn. 1973); Jones v. Johnson, 244 S.W.3d 338, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 438 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 16, 2007).

20-2-204. Death of party after appointment of agent.

The owner, chauffeur or operator of any motor vehicle that is not licensed under the laws of this state or any nonresident of this state who hires or procures the use of a motor vehicle licensed under the laws of this state for temporary use in this state, and who makes use of the privilege extended to nonresidents of the state, to operate such vehicle on the highway or highways within the state, shall be deemed to have consented that the appointment of the secretary of state as the owner's, chauffeur's, operator's or nonresident's agent for the purposes set forth in § 20-2-203 shall be irrevocable and binding upon such owner's, chauffeur's, operator's or nonresident's executor or administrator.

Where the person has died prior to the commencement of an action brought pursuant to § 20-2-203, this section and §§ 20-2-205 — 20-2-207, service of process shall be made on the executor, executrix, administrator or administratrix of the decedent in the same manner as is provided for action commenced while the person is living.

Where an action has been duly commenced under § 20-2-203, this section and §§ 20-2-205 — 20-2-207 by service upon a defendant who dies thereafter, the court shall allow the action to be continued against the person's executor or administrator upon motion with such notice as the court deems proper.

C. Supp. 1950, § 8675.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-225.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum, (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273.

Collateral References. Process
58, 80.

In case delivery of process so made by registered or certified mail is refused by the addressee of the process, such refusal to be evidenced by appropriate notation of such fact by the postal authorities, the refusal shall be deemed the equivalent of delivery and adequately constitutes service.

Acceptance of the registered or certified mail by any member of the addressee's family, over sixteen (16) years of age and residing in the same dwelling with the addressee, shall constitute a sufficient delivery of the mail to the addressee.

20-2-205. Service on secretary of state.

Service of process under §20-2-203 shall be made by lodging, by the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, the original summons and a copy certified by the clerk of the court in which action is brought, with a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00), with the secretary of state, who shall promptly send, postage prepaid, the certified copy by registered or certified return receipt mail to the defendant, along with a written notice that service was so made.

In case it appears, either before or after the lodging of process, as provided in subsection (a), that the nonresident is dead, then either original or alias process may issue, directed to the personal representative of the nonresident deceased and shall be sent, as provided in subsection (a), to the probate court of the county and state of the residence of the deceased at the time of the deceased's death. No appearance need be made nor shall judgment be taken against the personal representative until the lapse of sixty (60) days from the date of mailing the process to such probate court. The procedure for mailing such process and proof of service of process shall be as provided in this section and in §20-2-206 for the service upon living persons.

The fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) so paid by the plaintiff, when fact of payment is endorsed on the original process by the secretary of state, shall be taxed as plaintiff's cost, to abide the judgment.

Code 1932, §§ 8672, 8675; Acts 1949, ch. 47, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 8672; Acts 1955, ch. 265, § 2; 1971, ch. 332, § 1; 1980, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-226; Acts 1998, ch. 890, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.04, wherein a copy of complaint must be forwarded, seems to supplement this section.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Process, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 12 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36.

Law Reviews.

Expanded Bases of Jurisdiction — An Examination of Tennessee's New “Long-Arm” Statute (Harry G. Nichols, Jr.), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1484.

Cited: Thomas v. Altsheler, 191 Tenn. 640, 235 S.W.2d 806, 1951 Tenn. LEXIS 368 (1951); Keeble v. Loudon Utilities, 212 Tenn. 483, 370 S.W.2d 531, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 442 (1963); Yox v. Durgan, 302 F. Supp. 1262, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9926 (E.D. Tenn. 1969); Loyd v. Littlejohn, 639 S.W.2d 657, 1982 Tenn. App. LEXIS 397 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1982).

20-2-206. Evidence of service through secretary of state.

The original process, endorsed as provided in this section, an affidavit of the secretary of state setting forth the secretary of state's compliance with the requirements of §20-2-205, and the return receipt signed by, or duly in behalf of, the defendant, shall be attached together and sent to and filed by the clerk. There shall be endorsed on the original process by the secretary of state over the secretary of state's signature the date of the secretary of state's mailing the certified copy to the defendant and the date on which the secretary of state received the return receipt of the defendant. Thereupon service on the defendant shall be consummate. An act of a deputy or regular assistant of the secretary of state in the secretary of state's behalf shall be deemed the equivalent of the act of the secretary of state.

Code 1932, § 8673; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-227.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Carr v. Borchers: Tennessee's Nonresident Motorist Statute Revisited, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 357 (1992).

Cited: Thomas v. Altsheler, 191 Tenn. 640, 235 S.W.2d 806, 1951 Tenn. LEXIS 368 (1951); Keeble v. Loudon Utilities, 212 Tenn. 483, 370 S.W.2d 531, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 442 (1963); McDavid v. James, 64 F.R.D. 182, 1973 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10620 (D. Tenn. 1973).

20-2-207. Continuances after service by agent.

The court of action shall grant such continuance or continuances as may be necessary or proper to afford the defendant so served reasonable opportunity to make defense.

Code 1932, § 8674; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-228.

20-2-208. Actions against steamboat owners.

All persons, resident and nonresident of this state, running and operating steamboats in any of the rivers in or bordering on this state as common carriers, may be sued in law or equity in any county where the boat or boats of such person lands, for any cause of action or suit growing out of or connected with the business carried on or done by or in connection with the running and use of the boat or boats.

Service of process on any captain or clerk of any boat of such person, whether it is the particular boat complained of or immediately connected with the transaction out of which the cause of suit or action originates or not, shall be sufficient to bring such person into court.

Acts 1881, ch. 66, § 1; Shan., §§ 4547, 4548; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8680, 8681; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-229.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Service of Process Upon Unincorporated Nonresident Defendant, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 1057.

The Future of General Jurisdiction in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 559 (1997).

Cited: American Federation of Musicians v. Stein, 213 F.2d 679, 1954 U.S. App. LEXIS 3801 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1954).

20-2-209. Operation of watercraft in state as appointment of agent for process.

The operation, navigation or maintenance by a nonresident or nonresidents of a boat, ship, barge or other watercraft in this state, either in person or through others, and the acceptance thereby by the nonresident or nonresidents of the protection of the laws of this state for the watercraft, or the operation, navigation or maintenance by a nonresident or nonresidents of a boat, ship, barge or other watercraft in this state, either in person or through others, is deemed thereby to constitute an appointment by each such nonresident of the secretary of state, or some other person in the secretary of state's office during the secretary of state's absence whom the secretary of state may designate, to be the true and lawful agent of each such nonresident for service of process, upon whom may be served all lawful process in any suit, action or proceeding against the nonresident or nonresidents growing out of any accident or injury in which the nonresident or nonresidents may be involved while, either in person or through others, operating, navigating or maintaining a boat, ship, barge or other watercraft in this state; and the acceptance or the operating, navigating or maintaining in this state of the watercraft shall be a signification of each nonresident's agreement that any such process against each nonresident that is so served shall be of the same legal force and effect as if served on each nonresident personally.

The agency of the secretary of state to accept service of process shall continue for a period of one (1) year from the date of any accident or injury and shall not be revoked by death of the nonresident within the period of one (1) year.

Acts 1961, ch. 246, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-230.

Compiler's Notes. Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.04 wherein a copy of complaint must be forwarded, seems to supplement this section.

Cross-References. Process, Tenn. R. Civil P. 4.

Law Reviews.

Procedure and Evidence — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1353.

The Future of General Jurisdiction in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 559 (1997).

Collateral References.

Validity of service of process on nonresident owner of watercraft, under state “long-arm” statutes. 99 A.L.R.2d 287.

Process
58, 80.

20-2-210. Death of party after appointment of agent.

The nonresident who, under § 20-2-209, is deemed to have appointed the secretary of state as the nonresident's agent for process, shall further be deemed to have consented that the appointment of the secretary of state as the nonresident's agent for the purposes set forth in § 20-2-209 shall be irrevocable and binding upon the nonresident's executor or administrator.

Where such person has died prior to the commencement of an action brought pursuant to § 20-2-209, this section and §§ 20-2-211 — 20-2-213, service of process shall be made on the executor or administrator of the decedent in the same manner as provided for an action commenced while the person is living.

Where an action has been duly commenced under § 20-2-209, this section and §§ 20-2-211 — 20-2-213 by service upon a defendant who dies thereafter, the court shall allow the action to be continued against the defendant's executor or administrator upon motion, with such notice as the court deems proper.

Acts 1961, ch. 246, § 2; T.C.A., § 20-231.

Law Reviews.

Conflict of Laws — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Elliott E. Cheatham), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1162.

20-2-211. Manner of service on secretary of state.

The manner of service of process under §§20-2-209,20-2-210, this section and §§20-2-212 and20-2-213 shall be the same as is provided by §20-2-205, and the manner of evidencing such service through the secretary of state shall be the same as provided in §20-2-206.

Acts 1961, ch. 246, § 3; T.C.A., 20-232.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4 and 4B.

20-2-212. Continuances.

The court of action shall grant such continuance or continuances as may be necessary or proper to afford the defendant so served reasonable opportunity to make defense.

Acts 1961, ch. 246, § 4; T.C.A., § 20-233.

20-2-213. Other methods of service unaffected.

Nothing in §§20-2-209 —20-2-212 and this section shall be construed as affecting other methods of process against nonresidents as provided by existing laws.

Acts 1961, ch. 246, § 5; T.C.A., § 20-234.

20-2-214. Jurisdiction of persons unavailable to personal service in state — Classes of actions to which applicable.

Persons who are nonresidents of this state and residents of this state who are outside the state and cannot be personally served with process within this state are subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state as to any action or claim for relief arising from:

The transaction of any business within this state;

Any tortious act or omission within this state;

The ownership or possession of any interest in property located within this state;

Entering into any contract of insurance, indemnity or guaranty covering any person, property or risk located within this state at the time of contracting;

Entering into a contract for services to be rendered or for materials to be furnished in this state;

Any basis not inconsistent with the constitution of this state or of the United States;

Any action of divorce, annulment or separate maintenance where the parties lived in the marital relationship within this state, notwithstanding one party's subsequent departure from this state, as to all obligations arising for alimony, custody, child support or marital dissolution agreement, if the other party to the marital relationship continues to reside in this state.

As used in this section, “person” includes corporations and all other entities that would be subject to service of process if present in this state.

Any such person shall be deemed to have submitted to the jurisdiction of this state who acts in the manner described in subsection (a) through an agent or personal representative.

Acts 1965, ch. 67, § 1; 1972, ch. 689, § 1; 1975, ch. 177, § 1; 1978, ch. 715, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-235; Acts 1987, ch. 390, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.04 wherein a copy of complaint must be forwarded, seems to supplement this section.

Cross-References. Foreign corporations subject to actions, §20-2-201.

Process, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 513.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-8-4.1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Appearances, § 7; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 83; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 118; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, §§ 2, 5, 13; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 13; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, §§ 6-9.

Law Reviews.

A Tale of Two Jurisdictions, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 501 (2015).

Aligning Law and Forum: The Home Court Advantage, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

Constitutional Law — Personal Jurisdiction — A State's Ability to Exercise Jurisdiction over a Foreign Manufacturer, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 339 (2014).

Civil Procedure — Long Arm Statute — Davenport v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co.: Has Tennessee Fully Embraced the “Minimum Contacts” Test?, 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 117 (1989).

Civil Procedure — The Conspiracy Theory of Personal Jurisdiction — Imputation of Jurisdictional Contacts to Co-Conspirators, 69 Tenn. L. Rev. 221 (2001).

Federal Civil Procedure — Personal Jurisdiction — General Jurisdiction Over Foreign Corporations Based Upon Domestic Subsidiary Activity Within The Forum State, 82 Tenn. L. Rev. 461 (2015).

Rethinking Conspiracy Jurisdiction in Light of Stream of Commerce and Effects-Based Jurisdictional Principles, 71 Vand. L. Rev. 1333 (May 2018).

Service of Process Upon Foreign Defendants Under the Hague Convention (Michael L. Silhol) 28 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1992).

The Future of General Jurisdiction in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 559 (1997).

The Long-Arm Wrestle: Personal Jurisdiction in Tennessee (Steven E. Winn), 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (1989).

Torts — Volz v. Ledes: The Tennessee Supreme Court Abolishes Joint and Several Liability in Medical Malpractice Cases Involving Multiple Tortfeasors Whose Separate Acts Cause Indivisible Injury, 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1555 (1996).

Cited: Arthur K. Du Grenier, Inc. v. Stone, 220 Tenn. 255, 415 S.W.2d 883, 1967 Tenn. LEXIS 405 (1967); Allen & Bean, Inc. v. Miller, 61 Tenn. App. 373, 454 S.W.2d 367, 1970 Tenn. App. LEXIS 296 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1970); Southern Foundry Supply, Inc. v. Spang & Co., 225 Tenn. 447, 470 S.W.2d 187, 1971 Tenn. LEXIS 313 (1971); Tennessee Board of Dispensing Opticians v. Roy H. Park, Broadcasting of Tennessee, Inc., 512 S.W.2d 579, 1973 Tenn. App. LEXIS 262 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1973); Tennessee Valley Authority v. Mason Coal, Inc., 384 F. Supp. 1107, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12003 (E.D. Tenn. 1974); Turner v. Nationwide Auto Transporters, Inc., 507 F. Supp. 396, 1980 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16249 (E.D. Tenn. 1980); In re G. Weeks Secur., Inc., 3 B.R. 215, 1980 Bankr. LEXIS 5467 (Bankr. W.D. Tenn. 1980); In re G. Weeks Secur., Inc., 5 B.R. 220, 1980 Bankr. LEXIS 4845 (Bankr. W.D. Tenn. 1980); Williams v. Williams, 621 S.W.2d 567, 1981 Tenn. App. LEXIS 526 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1981); Chattanooga Corp. v. Klingler, 704 F.2d 903, 1983 U.S. App. LEXIS 28891 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1983); Mitchell v. White Motor Credit Corp., 627 F. Supp. 1241, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 30042 (M.D. Tenn. 1986); Local 670, United Rubber v. Int'l Union, United Rubber, 822 F.2d 613, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 8125 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1987); Third Nat'l Bank v. Wedge Group, Inc., 882 F.2d 1087, 1989 U.S. App. LEXIS 12198 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1989); Hospital Underwriting Group v. Summit Health, 719 F. Supp. 627, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9342 (M.D. Tenn. 1989); MCA Records v. Highland Music, 844 F. Supp. 1201, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19441 (M.D. Tenn. 1993); MCA Records v. Highland Music, 844 F. Supp. 1201, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19441 (M.D. Tenn. 1993); Shoney's, Inc. v. Chic Can Enters., 922 S.W.2d 530, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 794 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); Southern Sys. v. Torrid Oven Ltd., 58 F. Supp. 2d 843, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16913 (W.D. Tenn. 1999); First Tenn. Nat'l Corp. v. Horizon Nat'l Bank, 225 F. Supp. 2d 816, 2002 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19972 (W.D. Tenn. 2002).

20-2-215. Service on secretary of state — Forwarding by registered or certified mail — Personal representatives of deceased defendants — Time for appearance — Registered or certified mail refused.

Service of process pursuant to § 20-2-214 shall be made by lodging, by the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, the original summons and a copy certified by the clerk of the court in which the action is brought, with a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00), with the secretary of state, who shall promptly send, postage prepaid, the certified copy by registered or certified return receipt mail to the defendant, along with a written notice that service was so made.

In case it appears, either before or after the lodging of process as provided in subsection (a), that the nonresident is dead, then either original or alias process may issue directed to the personal representative of the nonresident deceased and shall be sent as provided in this section to the probate court of the county and state of the residence of the deceased at the time of the deceased's death. No appearance need be made nor shall judgment be taken against the personal representative until the lapse of sixty (60) days from the date of mailing the process to such probate court. The procedure for mailing such process and proof of service of process shall be as provided in this section and in § 20-2-216 for the service upon living persons.

The fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) so paid by plaintiff, when fact of payment is endorsed on the original process by the secretary of state, shall be taxed as plaintiff's cost, to abide the judgment.

In case delivery of process so made by registered or certified mail is refused by the addressee of the process, such refusal to be evidenced by appropriate notation of such fact by the postal authorities, such refusal shall be deemed the equivalent of delivery and adequately constitutes service.

Acts 1965, ch. 67, § 2; 1971, ch. 332, § 1; 1979, ch. 88, § 1; 1980, ch. 656, § 2; T.C.A., § 20-236; Acts 1998, ch. 890, § 7.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rules 4, 4B and 12 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36.

Law Reviews.

Expanded In Personam Jurisdiction — Due Process and the Tennessee Long Arm Statute (Ben H. Cantrell), 33 Tenn. L. Rev. 371.

Pleadings, Motions and Pre-Trial Procedure, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

Procedure — Nonresident Motorist Statute — Exclusive Remedy, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 591.

Recent Developments — Domestic Relations — Divorce — Due Process for Indigent Plaintiffs, 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 845.

Some Observations on Problems Posed by the Tennessee “Long Arm” Statute and Products Liability Cases (Joe A. Moore), 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 37.

Cited: Southern Machine Co. v. Mohasco Industries, Inc., 401 F.2d 374, 1968 U.S. App. LEXIS 5493 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1968); Kroger Co. v. Adkins Transfer Co., 284 F. Supp. 371, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7751 (M.D. Tenn. 1968); Garrett v. R. H. Macy & Co., 360 F. Supp. 872, 1972 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12643 (E.D. Tenn. 1972); Gentry v. Davis, 512 S.W.2d 4, 1974 Tenn. LEXIS 475 (Tenn. 1974); Harding v. Allied Products Corp., 703 F. Supp. 51, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 573 (W.D. Tenn. 1989); Inter-City Prods. Corp v. Willey, 149 F.R.D. 563, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14851 (M.D. Tenn. 1993).

20-2-216. Proof of mailing by secretary of state and receipt by defendant.

The original process, endorsed as described in this section, an affidavit of the secretary of state setting forth the secretary of state's compliance with the requirements of §20-2-215, and the return receipt signed by, or duly in behalf of, the defendant, shall be attached together and sent to and filed by the clerk. There shall be endorsed on the original process by the secretary of state over the secretary of state's signature the date the secretary of state mailed the certified copy to the defendant and the date on which the secretary of state received the return receipt of the defendant. Thereupon, service on the defendant shall be consummate. An act of a deputy or regular assistant of the secretary of state in the secretary of state's behalf shall be deemed the equivalent of the act of the secretary of state.

Acts 1965, ch. 67, § 3; T.C.A., § 20-237.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 4 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36.

Law Reviews.

Procedure — Nonresident Motorist Statute — Exclusive Remedy, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 591.

20-2-217. Extraterritorial personal service — Proof.

In addition to service of process on the secretary of state as set forth in this part, personal service of process may be made upon any party outside the state by any person over eighteen (18) years of age and not a party to the action. No order of court shall be required to constitute such person a proper officer to receive and execute the process.

An affidavit of the person serving the process shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the action is pending, stating the time, manner and place of service.

Acts 1965, ch. 67, § 4; 1979, ch. 418, § 2; T.C.A., § 20-238.

Law Reviews.

Expanded Bases of Jurisdiction — An Examination of Tennessee's New “Long-Arm” Statute (Harry G. Nichol, Jr.), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1484.

Cited: Inter-City Prods. Corp v. Willey, 149 F.R.D. 563, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14851 (M.D. Tenn. 1993).

20-2-218. Causes of action limited.

Only causes of action arising hereafter or heretofore from past or future transactions as set forth in §20-2-214 may be asserted against the defendant in an action in which jurisdiction over the defendant is based upon §§20-2-214 —20-2-217, this section and § 20-2-219.

Acts 1965, ch. 67, § 5; T.C.A., § 20-239.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum, (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273.

20-2-219. Process under other laws not affected — Liberal construction.

Nothing contained in §§ 20-2-214 — 20-2-218 and this section shall limit or affect the service of process in any other manner now provided by law.

Subsection (a) is in the nature of remedial legislation and it is the legislative intent that it be given a liberal construction.

Acts 1965, ch. 67, § 6; T.C.A., § 20-240.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 83.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum, (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273.

Civil Procedure — In Personam Jurisdiction — Act of Conception Provides Sufficient Contacts with Forum to Ground Long Arm Jurisdiction, 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 277.

Cited: Hamilton Nat'l Bank v. Russell, 261 F. Supp. 145, 1966 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7539 (E.D. Tenn. 1966); Temco, Inc. v. General Screw Products, Inc., 261 F. Supp. 793, 1966 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7977 (M.D. Tenn. 1966); Kroger Co. v. Dornbos, 408 F.2d 813, 1969 U.S. App. LEXIS 13119 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1969); Third Nat'l Bank v. Hardi--Gardens Supply of Ill., Inc., 380 F. Supp. 930, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7626 (M.D. Tenn. 1974).

20-2-220. Authority of deputy and assistant secretaries of state.

An act of a deputy or regular assistant of the secretary of state in the secretary of state's behalf under this part shall be deemed the equivalent of the act of the secretary of state; provided, that the deputy or assistant signs the name of the secretary of state by the secretary of state as the deputy or assistant so that the record will show the party acting for the secretary of state and that such party was a deputy of or regular assistant to the secretary of state.

Acts 1967, ch. 191, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-241.

20-2-221. “Person” defined.

As used in §§20-2-222 —20-2-225, “person” includes an individual, executor, administrator or other personal representative, or a corporation, partnership, association or any other legal or commercial entity, whether or not a citizen or domiciliary of this state and whether or not organized under the laws of this state.

Acts 1997, ch. 226, § 1.

20-2-222. Personal jurisdiction based upon enduring relationship.

A court may exercise personal jurisdiction over:

A person domiciled in, organized under the laws of, or maintaining the person's principal place of business in, the state as to any claim for relief; or

A person who is a party to an action of divorce, annulment or separate maintenance when the parties have lived in the marital relationship within this state, notwithstanding one party's subsequent departure from this state, as to all obligations arising for alimony, custody, child support, child visitation or marital dissolution agreement, if the other party to the marital relationship continues to reside in this state.

Acts 1997, ch. 226, § 1.

Cited: Spina v. State, 99 S.W.3d 596, 2002 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 797 (Tenn. Crim. App. 2002); In re Estate of Rinehart, 363 S.W.3d 186, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 616 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 15, 2011).